Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-259.01
School lands; adjacent to city of the first or second class; plat; request for annexation; filing.

When any educational lands abutting on and adjacent to any city of the first or second class that are needed for the expansion of such city have been subdivided into lots for the purpose of sale, as provided by section 72-257, the Board of Educational Lands and Funds may cause a plat of such subdivision to be filed in the office of the clerk of the city together with a resolution of the board requesting annexation of the tract to the city.

Laws 1953, c. 259, § 1, p. 868.